Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-901
Act, how cited.

Sections 79-901 to 79-977.03 shall be known and may be cited as the School Employees Retirement Act.

Laws 1991, LB 549, § 23;

Laws 1993, LB 292, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 833, § 29;

Laws 1995, LB 501, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 700, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 847, § 28;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-1501.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 536;

Laws 1996, LB 1076, § 14;

Laws 1997, LB 724, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 532, § 5;

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 44;

Laws 2002, LB 407, § 21;

Laws 2011, LB509, § 16;

Laws 2013, LB553, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB34, § 9;

Laws 2024, LB198, § 7.